it: Contaminazione target delle ruote: Polvere dei freni; Uso generico (sporco misto); Grasso / olio; Residui di ferro (contaminazione ferrosa); Fango / sporco; Sporco stradale / film da traffico; Sale / residui di sbrinamento; Catrame / macchie di asfalto; Altro
lt-LT: Ratų teršalų kiekio tikslinis rodiklis: Stabdžių dulkės; Bendrosios paskirties (įvairūs nešvarumai); Tepalas / alyva; Geležies nuosėdos (juodųjų metalų tarša); Purvas / žemės; Kelio apnašos / eismo plėvelė; Druska / ledą tirpdančių medžiagų likučiai; Dervos / asfalto dėmės; Kita
hu: Kerékszennyeződési célérték: Fékpor; Általános célú (vegyes szennyeződések); Zsír / olaj; Szállórozsda (vasas szennyeződés); Sár / kosz; Úti szennyeződés / közlekedési filmréteg; Só / jégmentesítő maradvány; Kátrány / aszfaltfoltok; Egyéb
th: เป้าหมายการปนเปื้อนของล้อ: ผงเบรก; อเนกประสงค์ (คราบดินผสม); จาระบี/น้ำมัน; ผงเหล็ก (การปนเปื้อนของโลหะเหล็ก); โคลน/สิ่งสกปรก; คราบถนน/คราบสกปรกจากจราจร; เกลือ/คราบน้ำยาละลายน้ำแข็ง; คราบยางมะตอย/แอสฟัลต์; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Contaminantul vizat pentru roată: Praf de frână; De uz general (murdărie mixtă); Grăsime / ulei; Particule de fier (contaminare feroasă); Noroi / murdărie; Murdărie de drum / peliculă de trafic; Sare / reziduuri de degivrare; Pete de gudron / asfalt; Altele
nl: Wiel verontreiniging doel: Remstof; Algemeen gebruik (gemengd vuil); Vet / olie; Vliegroest (ijzerhoudende vervuiling); Modder / vuil; Straatvuil / traffic film; Zout / strooizoutresten; Teer- / asfaltvlekken; Overig
cs: Cílený typ znečištění kol: Brzdový prach; Univerzální (smíšené nečistoty); Mastnota/olej; Polétavá rez (železité znečištění); Bláto/hlína; Silniční špína / dopravní film; Sůl / zbytky po odmrazování; Skvrny od dehtu/asfaltu; Jiné
vi: Mục tiêu chất gây ô nhiễm bánh xe: Bụi phanh; Đa dụng (nhiều loại bụi bẩn); Dầu / mỡ; Bụi sắt (cặn sắt); Bùn / đất; Bụi đường / Màng bẩn do xe cộ; Muối / cặn hóa chất tan băng; Nhựa đường / Vệt nhựa đường; Khác
zh-TW: 輪圈髒污目標: 煞車粉塵; 通用 (混合髒汙); 油脂/油汙; 鐵粉落塵 (含鐵汙染物); 泥巴/灰塵; 道路汙垢/交通膜; 鹽/除冰劑殘留物; 焦油/柏油斑點; 其他
en: Wheel contaminant target: Brake dust; General-purpose (mixed soils); Grease / oil; Iron fallout (ferrous contamination); Mud / dirt; Road grime / traffic film; Salt / de-icing residue; Tar / asphalt spots; Other
tr: Tekerlek kirletici hedefi: Fren tozu; Genel amaçlı (karışık kirler); Gres / yağ; Demir tozu (ferröz kirlenme); Çamur / kir; Yol kiri / trafik filmi; Tuz / buz çözücü kalıntısı; Katran / asfalt lekeleri; Diğer
hr-HR: Cilj onečišćenja kotača: Kočiona prašina; Višenamjensko (mješovita prljavština); Mast / ulje; Čestice željeza (kontaminacija željezom); Blato / prljavština; Cestovna prljavština / prometni film; Sol / ostaci sredstava za odleđivanje; Katran / mrlje od asfalta; Ostalo
fi: Kohteena oleva vanteen lika: Jarrupöly; Yleiskäyttö (sekalainen lika); Rasva/öljy; Lentoruoste (rautapitoinen lika); Muta/lika; Tielika / liikennekalvo; Suola / jäänpoistoaineen jäämät; Terva-/asfalttitahrat; Muu
sk-SK: Cieľ kontaminácie kolies: Brzdový prach; Viacúčelové (zmiešané nečistoty); Mastnota / olej; Náletová hrdza (kontaminácia železom); Blato / špina; Cestná špina / dopravný film; Soľ / zvyšky po posype; Decht / asfaltové škvrny; Iné
pt-PT: Contaminante-alvo da roda: Pó dos travões; Uso geral (sujidades mistas); Gordura / óleo; Resíduos de ferro (contaminação ferrosa); Lama / sujidade; Sujidade da estrada / película de trânsito; Sal / resíduos de descongelamento; Manchas de alcatrão / asfalto; Outro
pt-BR: Roda contaminante alvo: Pó de freio; Uso geral (sujeiras mistas); Graxa / óleo; Fuligem de ferro (contaminação ferrosa); Lama / sujeira; Sujeira da estrada / fuligem de trânsito; Sal / resíduo de degelo; Manchas de piche / asfalto; Outro
zh-CN: 轮子污染物去除目标: 刹车粉尘; 通用（混合污垢）; 油脂 / 机油; 铁粉（含铁污染物）; 泥土 / 污垢; 道路污垢 / 交通膜; 盐 / 除冰残留物; 焦油 / 沥青斑点; 其他
de: Zielverschmutzungsarten des Felgenreinigers: Bremsstaub; Allzweck (gemischter Schmutz); Fett / Öl; Flugrost (eisenhaltige Verunreinigungen); Schlamm / Schmutz; Straßenstaub / Schmutzfilm; Salz / Streusalzrückstände; Teer / Asphaltflecken; Andere
da: Målforurening for fælgrens: Bremsestøv; Universel (blandet snavs); Fedt/olie; Flyverust (jernholdig forurening); Mudder/snavs; Vejsnavs/trafikfilm; Salt/rester fra afisning; Tjære-/asfaltpletter; Andet
fr: Type de contaminant sur les roues: Poussière de frein; Polyvalent (saletés mixtes); Graisse / huile; Retombées de fer (contamination ferreuse); Boue / saleté; Crasse routière / film routier; Sel / résidus de dégivrage; Taches de goudron / d’asphalte; Autre
sv: Mål för föroreningar på hjul: Bromsdamm; Allmänt bruk (blandad smuts); Fett / olja; Flygrost (järnföroreningar); Lera / smuts; Vägsmuts / trafikfilm; Salt / avisningsrester; Tjära / asfaltsfläckar; Övrigt
ru: Целевые загрязнения колес: Тормозная пыль; Универсальные (смешанные загрязнения); Смазка / масло; Металлические вкрапления (железо); Грязь / земля; Дорожная грязь / статический налет; Соль / реагенты; Смола / пятна асфальта; Другое
ko: 휠 오염물질 제거 대상: 브레이크 분진; 범용(복합 오염); 그리스/오일; 철분(철 오염); 진흙/먼지; 도로 오염물/트래픽 필름; 염분/제설제 잔여물; 타르/아스팔트 자국; 기타
bg-BG: Целеви замърсители за почистване на колела: Прах от спирачките; Общо предназначение (смесени замърсявания); Грес/масло; Метални частици (замърсяване с желязо); Кал/мръсотия; Пътна мръсотия/филм от трафика; Сол/остатъци от обезледяване; Катран/петна от асфалт; Друго
ja: ホイール汚染物ターゲット: ブレーキダスト; 汎用 (混合汚れ); グリース/オイル; 鉄粉 (鉄系汚染物質); 泥/汚れ; ロードグライム/トラフィックフィルム; 塩/融雪剤の残留物; タール/アスファルト斑点; その他
sl-SI: Ciljna nečistoča čistila za platišča: Zavorni prah; Splošna uporaba (mešana umazanija); Mast/olje; Zračna rja (onesnaženje z železom); Blato/umazanija; Cestna umazanija / prometni film; Sol / ostanki sredstev za odmrzovanje; Katran / madeži asfalta; Drugo
el: Στόχος ρύπανσης τροχού: Σκόνη φρένων; Γενικής χρήσης (μικτοί ρύποι); Γράσο / λάδι; Υπολείμματα σιδήρου (σιδηρούχοι ρύποι); Λάσπη / χώμα; Ρύποι δρόμου / μεμβράνη καυσαερίων; Αλάτι / υπολείμματα αποπαγοποίησης; Πίσσα / λεκέδες ασφάλτου; Άλλο
pl: Docelowe zabrudzenia felg: Pył hamulcowy; Ogólnego przeznaczenia (mieszane zabrudzenia); Smar / olej; Opiłki żelaza (zabrudzenia metaliczne); Błoto / brud; Brud drogowy / film drogowy; Sól / osady ze środków odladzających; Ślady smoły / asfaltu; Inne
nb: Mål for forurensning av felg: Bremsestøv; Universell (blandet smuss); Fett/olje; Flygerust (jernforurensning); Gjørme/smuss; Veismuss/trafikkfilm; Salt / rester av avisingsmiddel; Tjære-/asfaltflekker; Annet
es: Objetivo de eliminación de contaminantes de la rueda: Polvo de frenos; Uso general (suciedad mixta); Grasa/aceite; Residuos de hierro (contaminación ferrosa); Barro/tierra; Mugre del camino/película de tráfico; Sal/residuos de deshielo; Manchas de alquitrán/asfalto; Otro